Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
ENFORCEMENT
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(b) “Marijuana” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(2) The Oregon  Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall, with the assistance of the State
Department of Agriculture, create and continually update a map of the following:
(a) Premises for which a license has been issued under ORS 475C.065; and
(b) The locations of industrial hemp operations licensed under ORS 571.281.
(3) The commission shall make the map described in  subsection (2) of this section avail-
able to law enforcement agencies  in this state and public employees and officials who are
responsible for the enforcement of state and local  laws regulating industrial hemp or
marijuana.
SECTION 2.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Industrial hemp” has the meaning given that term in ORS 571.269.
(b) “Marijuana” has the meaning given that term in ORS 475C.009.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, in consultation with the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, shall develop by rule a methodology to distinguish whether a  cannabis
plant is marijuana or industrial hemp for purposes of sections 1, 4, 5 and  6 of this 2024 Act.
The methodology must include  testing criteria and cannabinoid concentrations above which
immature or mature cannabis plants are presumptively considered to be marijuana.
(3) The department may order a  person licensed under ORS 571.281 to destroy any
cannabis plants located at an industrial hemp operation for which the person is responsible
if the cannabis plants  are presumptively considered to be marijuana under the methodology
developed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.
SECTION 3.
Sections 4 to 6 of this  2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS 571.260
to 571.348.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 1
SECTION 4. (1) The State Department of  Agriculture may enter into an interagency
agreement with the Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission to allow representatives of the
commission to carry out inspections of industrial hemp crops under  ORS 571.281 (7)
throughout this state.
(2) The department and the commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
The State Department of Agriculture shall adopt rules to allow:
(1) Law enforcement officers to accompany  representatives of the department to an in-
dustrial hemp operation for the purposes of  providing protection to the department’s repre-
sentatives; and
(2) Public employees and officials who are responsible for the enforcement  of state and
local laws to accompany representatives of the department to  an industrial hemp operations
in order to carry out inspections that the public employees or officials  are authorized to
perform.
SECTION 6. The Governor may order that the Oregon National Guard provide assistance
and support to the State Department  of Agriculture and law enforcement in carrying out
inspections of industrial hemp crops under ORS 571.281 (7) and  other duties of the depart-
ment related to the enforcement of ORS 571.260 to 571.348.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP
SECTION 7.  ORS 475C.297 is amended to read:
475C.297. The Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund is established in the  State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Marijuana Control and Regu-
lation Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission to administer and enforce ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586, 475C.600 to 475C.648, [and] 475C.925 and 571.309 and sections 2 and 4 of this
2024 Act.
SECTION 8.  ORS 571.306 is amended to read:
571.306. [ (1) A person licensed under ORS  571.281 may, within the boundaries of this state,
transport to or receive from: ]
[(a)] (1) A person  licensed under ORS 571.281 or a laboratory licensed under ORS 475C.548 may,
within the boundaries of this state, transport or receive  industrial hemp or  an industrial hemp
commodity that contains  no more tetrahydrocannabinol than allowed by the State Department of
Agriculture by rule if the industrial hemp or industrial hemp used in the industrial  hemp commodity
originated from a crop [ inspected under ORS  571.281 (7) ] that was found to not contain an average
tetrahydrocannabinol  concentration  exceeding the concentration specified by the department by
rule.
[(b)] (2) A person licensed under ORS 475C.085,  475C.093 or 475C.097 may, within the bound-
aries of this state, receive from a person licensed under ORS 571.281 industrial hemp or  an
industrial hemp commodity or product that contains no more tetrahydrocannabinol than allowed  by
the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission by rule  if the industrial hemp or industrial hemp used
in the industrial hemp commodity or product originated  from a crop [ inspected under ORS 571.281
(7)] that was found to not contain an average tetrahydrocannabinol concentration exceeding the
concentration specified by the department by rule.
[(2)] (3) Industrial hemp or  an industrial hemp commodity or product transported or received
as described in this section may not be considered a “marijuana item.”
SECTION 9.  ORS 571.309 is amended to read:
571.309. The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission, in consultation with the State Depart-
ment of Agriculture, shall adopt rules to establish:
(1) The maximum concentration of  tetrahydrocannabinol permitted in a single serving of an in-
dustrial hemp product;
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 2
(2) The maximum  concentration of any other cannabinoid, adult use cannabinoid or artificially
derived cannabinoid that is permitted in a single serving of an industrial hemp product; [ and]
(3) The number of servings that are permitted in a package of industrial hemp products[ .]; and
(4) Standards for approving industrial hemp products that  contain artificially derived
cannabinoids and that are intended for sale at retail. The rules adopted under this subsection
may not be more restrictive  than the rules applicable to the sale at retail of adult use
cannabis items.
INDUSTRIAL HEMP PRODUCT REGISTRATION
SECTION 10. Sections 11 to 14a  of this 2024 Act are added to and made a part of ORS
571.260 to 571.348.
SECTION 11. (1) As used in  this section and sections 12 and 13 of this 2024 Act,
“cannabinoid” means any  of the chemical compounds that are the active constituents derived
from industrial hemp.
(2)(a) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission, in consultation with the State De-
partment of Agriculture, shall establish a  registration program for industrial hemp products
that contain cannabinoids and are intended for  human or animal consumption or use. An
industrial hemp product  described in this paragraph is not subject to the requirements of
this section unless the  industrial hemp product is in its final form and ready for sale,
transfer or delivery to a consumer in this state.
(b) A person that is  located within or outside this state and that, as determined by the
commission by rule, is responsible for the  manufacture, packaging or distribution of an in-
dustrial hemp product described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection shall, prior to selling,
transferring or delivering the industrial hemp product directly to a consumer in this  state
or selling, transferring or delivering the industrial hemp product to a retailer  in this state
for the purpose of sale to a consumer in this state:
(A) Annually submit the information described  in subsection (3) of this section to the
commission in a manner specified by the commission by rule;
(B) Include on the industrial hemp product a label that contains the information de-
scribed in subsection (4) of this section; and
(C) Pay an annual registration fee established by the commission by rule.
(3) A person described in subsection (2) of this section shall  submit to the commission
the following information about an industrial  hemp product that contains cannabinoids and
is intended for human or animal consumption or use:
(a) The name and type of the product;
(b) The name and physical address of the manufacturer of the product;
(c) The mailing address of the manufacturer of the product;
(d) A certificate of analysis for a batch of the product;
(e) A copy of the label for the product;
(f) A statement about whether the product is an adult use cannabis item; and
(g) Any other information required by the commission by rule.
(4) A person described in subsection (2) of this section shall  label an industrial hemp
product that contains  cannabinoids and is intended for human or animal consumption or use
with a label that contains the following information:
(a) The name and type of the product;
(b) The name and physical address of the manufacturer of the product;
(c) The ingredients of the product;
(d) The net weight or volume of the product;
(e) The serving size and number of servings contained in a package of the product;
(f) The potency of the product and a list of the cannabinoid contents of the product;
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 3
(g) The address of a publicly accessible website  that contains the certificate of analysis
for the product;
(h) Health and safety warnings required by law or rule;
(i) If the product is an adult use cannabis item, the following language:
(A) “For use only by adults 21 and older.”; and
(B) “Keep out of reach of children.”;
(j) If the  product is a food product, any other information required by law or rule for food
products; and
(k) Any other information required by the commission by rule.
(5) In adopting rules under subsection (4) of this section, the commission:
(a) May establish different labeling standards for different types of  industrial hemp pro-
ducts that contain cannabinoids and are intended for  human or animal consumption or use,
and may consider existing product quality requirements or standards applicable  to different
types of products; and
(b) May not adopt rules that are more restrictive than  is reasonably necessary to protect
the public health and safety.
(6) If an industrial hemp product is intended only for human  consumption or use, the
person described in subsection (2) of this  section shall comply with the requirements of ORS
571.337 and 571.339.
(7)(a) The fee collected under this section may not exceed  the cost of administering ORS
571.309 and sections 2, 4 and 11 to 14 of this 2024 Act.
(b) Fees collected under this section shall be deposited in the Marijuana Control and
Regulation Fund established under ORS 475C.297.
(8) A person is not required to submit  to the commission the information described in
subsection (3) of  this section for an industrial hemp product that contains cannabinoids and
is intended for human or animal consumption or use if another person has submitted  the
information for the product  and the product continues to be consistent with the previously
submitted information.
(9) The commission may refuse to register an industrial  hemp product that contains
cannabinoids and is intended  for human or animal consumption or use if, based on the in-
formation described in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, the sale of the product to  a con-
sumer is prohibited by section 12 of this 2024 Act or by the commission by rule.
(10) This section does not apply to an industrial hemp product that:
(a) Does not contain cannabinoids;
(b) Is intended only for topical use;
(c) Is an industrial  hemp grain or fiber product that does not contain added cannabinoids;
(d) Is a commercial feed product for animals registered under ORS 633.006 to 633.089; or
(e) Is transported through this state en route to a final destination in another state.
SECTION 12.
A person may not sell, transfer or deliver to  a consumer in this state an
industrial hemp product that contains cannabinoids and is  intended for human or animal
consumption or use that:
(1) Is not registered under section 11 of this 2024 Act.
(2) Does not bear  a label that meets the requirements of section 11 of this 2024 Act, or
bears a label  that does not precisely indicate the contents of the container or that may de-
ceive a consumer regarding the nature,  composition, quantity, age or quality of the contents.
(3) Includes upon the packaging any  untruthful or misleading statements, including but
not limited to, a health claim that  is not supported by a consensus of publicly available sci-
entific evidence, including evidence from  well-designed studies conducted in a manner that
is consistent with generally recognized scientific  procedures and principles and for which
there is significant scientific agreement  among experts qualified by scientific training and
experience to evaluate such a claim.
(4) Is attractive to minors, including by featuring:
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 4
(a) A cartoon;
(b) A design, brand or name that resembles a product that is not an  industrial hemp
product that contains  cannabinoids and is intended for human or animal consumption or use
and is of a type typically marketed to minors;
(c) A symbol or celebrity that is commonly used to market products to minors;
(d) An image of minors; or
(e) Words that refer to  products that are commonly associated with minors or marketed
to minors.
(5) In the commission’s discretion:
(a) Bears or contains any poisonous or deleterious substance, including but not limited
to tobacco or  nicotine, in a quantity rendering the product injurious in a manner that may
pose a risk to human health, or that exceeds any established safe tolerance;
(b) Consists in whole or in part  of any filthy, putrid or decomposed substance or is oth-
erwise unfit for human or animal consumption or use;
(c) Is processed, prepared,  packaged or held under improper or insanitary conditions or
under conditions that increase  the probability of contamination with excessive
microorganisms or physical contaminants or of cross-contamination;
(d) Is held or packaged  in containers composed, in whole or in part, of any poisonous or
deleterious substance that renders the contents potentially injurious to health;
(e) Includes any substitute substance;
(f) Is damaged or inferior; or
(g) Includes any substance intended to increase the bulk  or weight of the product, reduce
the quality or strength of the product or make  the product appear better or of greater value.
(6) Does not meet relevant minimum standards provided by the laws of this state.
SECTION 13.
Subject to ORS chapter 183, the  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission
may:
(1) If the  commission has reasonable cause to believe that any quantity or lot of indus-
trial hemp product that contains cannabinoids and is intended  for human or animal con-
sumption or use is sold, transferred or delivered in violation of section 11  or 12 of this 2024
Act or rules adopted pursuant to section 11 or 12 of this 2024  Act, issue and enforce an order
to prohibit the disposal, distribution or  use in any manner of the quantity or lot. The person
to whom the order is issued shall immediately remove from  locations readily visible and ac-
cessible to the public any product in packaged form that is subject to the  order. The com-
mission may enforce the  order until all actions against the order, including any contested
case, are resolved, and shall release from the order the product if the violation is cured.
(2) Seize any quantity or lot that the commission determines does not comply with  sec-
tion 11 or 12 of this 2024 Act or rules adopted under section 11 or 12 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 14. In addition to any other liability or penalty provided  by law, the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission may impose a civil penalty, in the manner provided in ORS
183.745, not to exceed $10,000 for each violation of a provision of section 11, 12 or 13 of  this
2024 Act, a rule adopted pursuant to section 11, 12  or 13 of this 2024 Act or an order issued
by the commission under section 13 of this 2024  Act. Moneys collected under this section
shall be deposited in the General Fund and be available for general governmental purposes.
SECTION 14a. The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may adopt rules  to carry
out sections 11 to 14 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 15.  ORS 475C.297, as amended by section 7 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
475C.297. The Marijuana Control and Regulation Fund is established in the  State Treasury,
separate and distinct from the General Fund. Interest earned by  the Marijuana Control and Regu-
lation Fund shall be credited to the fund.  Moneys in the fund are continuously appropriated to the
Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission to administer and enforce ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586, 475C.600 to 475C.648, 475C.925 and  571.309 and sections 2 , [ and] 4 and 11 to
14 of this 2024 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 5
SECTION 16. ORS 571.312 is repealed.
SECTION 17. (1) Sections 11 to 14a of this 2024 Act, the  amendments to ORS 475C.297 by
section 15 of this 2024 Act and the repeal of ORS 571.312 by section 16 of this 2024 Act become
operative on January 1, 2026.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission and the State  Department of Agricul-
ture may take any action before the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section
that is necessary to  enable the commission and the department to exercise, on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of  the duties, functions and
powers conferred on the commission and the department by sections 11 to 14a of  this 2024
Act, the amendments to ORS 475C.297 by section 15 of this 2024 Act and the  repeal of ORS
571.312 by section 16 of this 2024 Act.
MARIJUANA LICENSE CAPS AND MORATORIUM
SECTION 18. Section 19 of  this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525.
SECTION 19. (1) The Oregon Liquor  and Cannabis Commission may not accept an appli-
cation for a new license under ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093 or 475C.097 unless:
(a) For a production license under ORS 475C.065, there  is not more than one active li-
cense per 7,500 residents in this state who are 21 years of age or older.
(b) For a processor license under ORS 475C.085, there is not  more than one active license
per 12,500 residents in this state who are 21 years of age or older.
(c) For a wholesale license under ORS 475C.093, there is not more than  one active license
per 12,500 residents in this state who are 21 years of age or older.
(d) For a retail license under ORS 475C.097, there is not more than one active license  per
7,500 residents in this state who are 21 years of age or older.
(2) Subsection (1) of this section does not apply to:
(a) An application for renewal of a license described in subsection (1) of this section;
(b) An application  for reissuance of a license described in subsection (1) of this section
necessitated by a change in the location or ownership of a production,  processing, wholesale
or retail facility or premises;
(c) An application for a change in size of a mature marijuana plant grow canopy; or
(d) The sale or purchase  of a license described in subsection (1) of this section issued
prior to the operative date specified in section 22 of this 2024 Act.
(3) The commission may adopt rules to carry out this section.
SECTION 20.
Section 19 of  this 2024 Act applies to applications received on or after
January 1, 2025.
SECTION 21.  ORS 475C.049 is amended to read:
475C.049. (1) Subject to section 19 of  this 2024 Act,  the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Com-
mission shall approve or deny an application to be licensed under ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525. Except
as provided in subsection (2) of this section, upon  receiving an application under ORS 475C.033, the
commission may not delay processing, approving or denying the application or, if the  application is
approved, issuing the license.
(2) The commission may delay processing, approving or denying an application described in
subsection (1) of this section only if:
(a) The  applicant, or a person named on the application, holds a license issued under ORS
475C.005 to  475C.525 and the commission has issued a notice proposing revocation of the license for
one or more violations of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525  that are administrative in nature, as determined
by the commission, or a notice proposing suspension of the license pursuant to ORS 305.385;
(b) The applicant is applying for a license at a premises where the applicant  seeks to assume
ownership of an  existing business for which a license has been issued under ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525 and the commission has issued a notice proposing revocation of the  license for the existing
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 6
business or a notice proposing suspension of the license for the existing business pursuant  to ORS
305.385; or
(c) The commission has received  information from law enforcement that the applicant or a per-
son named on the application is engaging, or has engaged, in the unregulated commerce of
marijuana items or unlawful manufacture or delivery of controlled substances.
(3) The licenses described in ORS 475C.005 to  475C.525 must be issued by the commission, sub-
ject to the provisions of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 and  rules adopted under ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525.
(4) The commission may not license a  premises that does not have defined boundaries. A prem-
ises does not need to be enclosed by a wall, fence or  other structure, but the commission may re-
quire a premises to be enclosed as a condition  of issuing or renewing a license. The commission may
not license a mobile premises.
SECTION 22.
(1) Section 19 of this 2024 Act and the amendments to ORS 475C.049 by
section 21 of this 2024 Act become operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission may take any action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commission
to exercise, on or after the  operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by section 19 of this 2024 Act
and the amendments to ORS 475C.049 by section 21 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 23.
 Section 2, chapter 108, Oregon Laws 2022, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  Section 1 , chapter 108, Oregon Laws 2022,  [ of this 2022 Act ] is repealed on [ March 31,
2024] December 31, 2024.
MINOR DECOY OPERATIONS
SECTION 24. Section 25 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 475C.005 to
475C.525.
SECTION 25. (1)(a) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission shall  by rule develop
uniform standards for minor decoy operations used  to investigate persons selling, trans-
ferring or delivering industrial hemp products that contain cannabinoids and are intended for
human or  animal consumption or use in this state for violations of the laws of this state
prohibiting sales of adult use cannabis items to minors.
(b) Uniform standards established under  this section apply to all investigations conducted
by the  commission that use minor decoys. The commission shall encourage all law enforce-
ment agencies  in this state to use the uniform standards established under this section for
minor decoy operations conducted by the law enforcement agencies.
(2) To the greatest extent  possible, the uniform standards established by the commission
under this section must:
(a) Be the same for minor decoy operations conducted by the commission and  for minor
decoy operations conducted by law enforcement agencies of this state; and
(b) Provide for coordination between the  commission and law enforcement agencies of
this state in conducting minor decoy operations.
(3) The failure of the commission or a law enforcement agency to follow the uniform
standards established under this section is not grounds for challenging a complaint, citation
or conviction for violation of the laws prohibiting the  sale of adult use cannabis items to
minors.
(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or any provision  of
571.260 to 571.348, the commission may not consider the  sale of an adult use cannabis item
to a minor that results from a minor decoy operation that is not conducted  in compliance
with the  uniform standards established under this section for the purpose of imposing a civil
penalty.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 7
(5) The commission shall give notice of the uniform standards established under this
section to all law enforcement agencies of this state that conduct minor decoy operations.
SECTION 26. (1) Section 25 of this 2024 Act becomes operative on January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may take any  action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commission
to exercise,  on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all of
the duties, functions and powers conferred  on the commission by section 25 of this 2024 Act.
TEMPORARY  PERMITS
SECTION 27.
 ORS 475C.269 is amended to read:
475C.269. (1) An individual who performs work for or on behalf of a licensee or a laboratory li-
censed  under  ORS 475C.548 must have a valid permit or temporary permit  issued by the Oregon
Liquor and Cannabis Commission under ORS 475C.273 if the individual participates in:
(a) The delivery, possession, production, propagation, processing,  sampling, securing, selling or
testing of marijuana items at the premises or laboratory for which the license has been issued;
(b) The recording of the delivery, possession, production, propagation,  processing, sampling, se-
curing, selling or testing of marijuana  items at the premises or laboratory for which the license has
been issued; or
(c) The verification of any document described in ORS 475C.217.
(2) A licensee or a laboratory licensed under ORS 475C.548 must verify that  an individual has
a valid permit or temporary permit  issued under ORS 475C.273 before allowing the individual to
perform, or continue to perform, any work described in subsection (1) of this section  at the premises
or laboratory for which the license has been issued.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 475C.273 is amended to read:
475C.273. (1) The Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission shall issue permits to qualified ap-
plicants to perform work described in ORS 475C.269. The  commission shall adopt rules establishing:
(a) The qualifications for performing work described in ORS 475C.269;
(b) The term of a permit issued under this section;
(c) Procedures for applying for and renewing a permit issued under this section; and
(d) Reasonable application, issuance and renewal fees for a permit issued under this section.
(2)(a) The commission may require an individual applying for a permit under this section to
successfully complete a  course, made available by or through the commission, through which the
individual receives training on:
(A) Checking identification;
(B) Detecting intoxication;
(C) Handling marijuana items;
(D) If applicable, producing and propagating marijuana;
(E) If applicable, processing marijuana;
(F) The content of ORS 475C.005  to 475C.525 and rules adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525;
(G) If applicable, the content of ORS 475C.540  to 475C.586 and rules adopted under ORS
475C.540 to 475C.586; or
(H) Any matter deemed necessary by the commission to protect the public health and safety.
(b) The commission or other provider of a course may charge a reasonable fee for the course.
(c) The commission may not  require an individual to successfully complete a course more than
once, except that:
(A) As part of a  final order suspending a permit issued under this section, the commission may
require a permit holder to successfully complete the course as a condition of  lifting the suspension;
and
(B) As part of a  final order revoking a permit issued under this section, the commission shall
require an individual to successfully complete the course prior to applying for a new permit.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 8
(3) The commission shall conduct a criminal records  check under ORS 181A.195 on an individual
applying for a permit under this section.
(4) Subject to the applicable  provisions of ORS chapter 183, the commission may suspend, revoke
or refuse to issue  or renew a permit or temporary permit  if the individual who is applying for or
who holds the permit  or temporary permit :
(a) Is convicted of a felony or is convicted of an offense  under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525, except
that the commission may  not consider a conviction for an offense under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
if the date of the conviction is two or more years before the date of the application or renewal;
(b) Violates any provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to  475C.586 or any rule
adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586; or
(c) Makes a false statement to the commission.
(5) A permit issued under this section is a personal privilege and permits  work described under
ORS 475C.269 only for the individual who holds the permit.
(6)(a) The commission shall establish by rule a process to issue to an  individual, upon
receipt of the individual’s application for a permit described  in subsection (1) of this section,
a temporary permit to perform work described in ORS 475C.269 until the  issuance or denial
of a permit described in subsection (1) of this section.
(b) A  temporary permit expires on the date on which the individual is issued or denied
a permit described in subsection (1) of this section.
(c) The  commission may adopt rules to establish conditions for the issuance of a tempo-
rary permit under this subsection.
SECTION 29.
 ORS 475C.117 is amended to read:
475C.117. (1) A marijuana  retailer that holds a license issued under ORS 475C.097 may make
deliveries to a consumer pursuant to the  consumer’s bona fide order received by the marijuana
retailer. The delivery of marijuana items under this section may be made to a consumer:
(a) Within  the same city or unincorporated area of the county in which the marijuana retailer
is located; or
(b) In  a city or the unincorporated area of a county that is adjacent to the city or
unincorporated area of the county in which the marijuana retailer  is located, provided the adjacent
city or county has adopted an  ordinance allowing for the delivery of marijuana items by a marijuana
retailer located in an adjacent city or unincorporated area of a county.
(2) A marijuana retailer that makes deliveries under this section shall:
(a) Ensure that deliveries are made in an efficient and timely manner.
(b) Upon request, provide to the  Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission information on each
vehicle  used  to make deliveries of marijuana items under this section, including the make, model,
year, color, vehicle identification number and registration plate number.
(c) Maintain an electronic or physical record of each bona fide order for the  delivery of
marijuana items that the marijuana retailer fulfills.
(d) Report to the commission, and as necessary to the  appropriate law enforcement agency, any
accidents or losses involving a delivery vehicle.
(3) An individual who makes deliveries on behalf of a marijuana retailer under this section:
(a) Shall:
(A) Hold a permit or temporary permit  issued under ORS 475C.273 and carry the permit or
temporary permit while making deliveries under this section.
(B) Have a method of secure electronic communication in order to communicate with the
marijuana retailer for which the individual is making deliveries.
(C) Maintain an electronic or physical record of a  bona fide order for a delivery of a marijuana
item.
(D) Present to the consumer a  printed or electronic delivery manifest and obtain on the manifest
the consumer’s  written or electronic signature verifying completion of the delivery of marijuana
items.
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 9
(E) Except in the case of an emergency or unsafe road conditions or as necessary for fuel,  rest
or vehicle repair, travel only between the premises of the marijuana retailer and the locations  at
which the deliveries of marijuana items are made.
(b) May not:
(A) Leave a delivery vehicle that contains marijuana items unattended unless  the delivery ve-
hicle is locked and equipped with an active vehicle alarm system.
(B) Carry more than $10,000 worth of marijuana items in a delivery vehicle at any one time.
(C) Consume, or be under the influence of, marijuana  while making deliveries under this section.
(4) A delivery vehicle must:
(a) While being used for making deliveries, be equipped with an active global positioning  system
device that tracks the location of the delivery vehicle and enables the marijuana retailer  for which
the deliveries are being made to identify the location of the delivery vehicle.
(b) Be  equipped with a lockable container in a secured cargo area of the delivery vehicle that
is of a size appropriate to contain the marijuana items being delivered.
(c) Be free of any markings that may indicate  that the delivery vehicle is used for the purpose
of delivering marijuana items.
(5) A  delivery of marijuana items may not be made to a consumer who is located on land owned
or leased by the federal government.
(6) The commission may adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 475C.197 is amended to read:
475C.197. (1) Notwithstanding  the lapse, suspension or revocation of a permit or temporary
permit issued under ORS 475C.273, the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Commission may:
(a) Proceed with  any investigation of, or any action or disciplinary proceeding against, the
person who held the permit or temporary permit ; [ or]
(b) Revise or render void an order suspending or  revoking the permit or temporary permit [.];
or
(c) Revoke or suspend a permit for actions that occurred while the  permittee held a
temporary permit.
(2) In cases involving the proposed denial of a permit or temporary permit  issued under ORS
475C.273, the applicant for the permit or temporary permit  may not withdraw the  applicant’s ap-
plication.
SECTION 31.  ORS 475C.209 is amended to read:
475C.209. (1) In order to transport marijuana items, a licensee must create a manifest that  con-
tains the following information:
(a) The name of the driver of the transport vehicle;
(b) Identifying information for the driver’s permit or temporary permit  issued  under ORS
475C.273;
(c) The license plate number, make and model of the transport vehicle;
(d) The name of the licensee from which the marijuana or marijuana items are being  trans-
ported;
(e) A detailed inventory of the marijuana and marijuana items being transported;
(f) The location of  any overnight stop during transportation, and the estimated time of the
overnight stop; and
(g) The destination of the marijuana and marijuana items being transported.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (1)(f) of this  section, a manifest created under this section
is not required to include transport route information.
(3) The transport driver shall carry in the transport vehicle a copy of the manifest.
SECTION 32.
 ORS 475C.265 is amended to read:
475C.265. (1) Subject to  subsection (3) of this section, the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis Com-
mission may revoke, suspend or restrict a  license issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or
475C.548 or require a licensee or licensee representative to undergo training if  the commission finds
or has reasonable ground to believe that the licensee or licensee representative:
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 10
(a) Has violated a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586  or a rule
adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(b) Has diverted marijuana to the  interstate market or an illicit market or has diverted re-
sources to a criminal enterprise.
(c) Has introduced  into the marijuana industry regulated under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
cannabinoids or marijuana not produced  or processed by a licensee and not tracked in the system
developed and maintained under ORS 475C.177.
(d) Has made any false representation or statement to the commission regarding  compliance
with a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to  475C.586 or a rule adopted under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586  in order to induce or prevent action by the commis-
sion.
(e) Is in the habit of using  alcoholic liquor, habit-forming drugs, marijuana or controlled sub-
stances to excess.
(f) Has misrepresented to  a customer or the public any marijuana items sold by the licensee or
licensee representative.
(g) Since the issuance of the license, has been convicted of  a felony, of violating any of the
marijuana laws of this state, general  or local, or of any misdemeanor or violation of any municipal
ordinance committed on the premises for which the license has been issued.
(h) Has sold a marijuana item to a person under 21 years of age.
(2) In addition to the grounds listed in subsection (1) of this section, the commission may take
an action described in subsection (1) of this section if there is a history of a lack  of institutional
control involving the premises for which a license has been issued under ORS  475C.005 to 475C.525
or 475C.548.
(3)(a) The commission may revoke a license under subsection (1)(a) of  this section only when the
conduct poses a significant risk to public health or safety.
(b) The commission shall consider as mitigating factors to the conduct  described in subsection
(1) of this section the following:
(A) Self-reporting by a licensee or applicant;
(B) A demonstration that, to the satisfaction of the commission, the conduct of the licensee or
applicant is not persistent or serious; and
(C) A demonstration  that, to the satisfaction of the commission, the licensee’s willingness and
ability to adequately control the premises for which  a license has been issued under ORS 475C.005
to 475C.525 or 475C.548 and any inventory stored at the premises.
(4) The commission may suspend or restrict a license  issued under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525
or 475C.548 or require a licensee or licensee  representative to undergo training if the commission
finds or has reasonable grounds to believe that the licensee or  licensee representative has violated
a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525  or 475C.540 to 475C.586 or a rule adopted under ORS
475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540 to 475C.586.
(5) The  commission may suspend or revoke a permit or temporary permit  issued under ORS
475C.273 to an individual rather than suspend or revoke a license issued under ORS  475C.005 to
475C.525 or 475C.548 if the commission  determines that permit suspension or revocation is more
appropriate.
(6)(a) The commission may revoke a marijuana retailer license issued under ORS 475C.097 if the
licensee fails to:
(A) Pay the tax as  required under ORS 475C.682 twice in any four consecutive quarters and the
Department of Revenue  has issued to the licensee a distraint warrant under ORS 475C.688 for the
nonpayment of tax; or
(B) File a return as required under ORS 475C.682 twice in any four consecutive quarters and
the department has issued to the licensee a notice  of determination and assessment under ORS
475C.688 for failure to file a return.
(b) The department’s written notice to the commission that a licensee described under this sub-
section has failed to pay a tax or file a return twice in any four consecutive quarters,  and that the
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 11
department has issued a distraint warrant or notice of  determination and assessment, shall consti-
tute prima facie evidence of the licensee’s failure to pay the tax or file a return.
SECTION 33.  ORS 475C.742 is amended to read:
475C.742. A financial institution that provides financial services  customarily provided by finan-
cial institutions pursuant to powers  granted by ORS 717.200 to 717.320, 717.900 and 717.905, the
Bank Act or by ORS chapter 723 to a marijuana processing site registered under ORS 475C.815, a
medical marijuana dispensary registered under ORS 475C.833, a marijuana producer that holds a li-
cense under ORS 475C.065, a marijuana processor that holds a license under ORS 475C.085, a
marijuana wholesaler that holds a license under ORS 475C.093, a marijuana  retailer that holds a
license under ORS 475C.097, a laboratory that holds a license  under ORS 475C.548 or a person to
whom a permit or temporary permit  has been issued under ORS 475C.273 is exempt from any
criminal law of  this state an element of which may be proven by substantiating that a person pro-
vides financial services customarily provided by financial institutions  pursuant to powers granted
by ORS 717.200 to 717.320, 717.900 and 717.905, the Bank Act or  ORS chapter 723 to a person who
possesses, delivers or manufactures marijuana or marijuana derived products.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 475C.746 is amended to read:
475C.746. (1)  Notwithstanding any law relating to the exemption of information from public dis-
closure under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525 or 475C.540  to 475C.586, upon the request of a financial
institution, the Oregon Liquor and Cannabis  Commission shall provide to the financial institution
the following information:
(a) Whether a person with whom the financial institution is  doing business holds a license under
ORS 475C.065, 475C.085, 475C.093, 475C.097 or 475C.548 or  a permit or temporary permit  under
ORS 475C.273;
(b) The name of any other business or individual affiliated with the person;
(c) A copy of  the application, and any supporting documentation submitted with the application,
for a license or a permit or temporary permit  submitted by the person;
(d) If applicable, data relating to sales and the volume of product sold by the person;
(e) Whether the person is currently compliant with the provisions of  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 and 475C.600 to 475C.648 and rules adopted under  ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 and 475C.600 to 475C.648;
(f) Any past or pending violation by the person  of a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.600 to 475C.648  or a rule adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.600 to 475C.648; and
(g) Any penalty imposed upon the person for violating  a provision of ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.600 to 475C.648 or a rule  adopted under ORS 475C.005 to 475C.525,
475C.540 to 475C.586 or 475C.600 to 475C.648.
(2) Upon receiving a request under subsection (1) of this section, the commission shall provide
the requesting financial institution with the requested information.
(3) The commission  may charge a financial institution a reasonable fee to cover the adminis-
trative costs of providing information under this section.
SECTION 35.
(1) The amendments to ORS 475C.117, 475C.197, 475C.209, 475C.265, 475C.269,
475C.273, 475C.742 and 475C.746  by sections 27 to 34 of this 2024 Act become operative on
January 1, 2025.
(2) The Oregon Liquor and  Cannabis Commission may take any action before the opera-
tive date specified in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary to enable the commission
to exercise, on and after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section, all  of
the duties, functions and powers conferred on the commission by the amendments  to ORS
475C.117, 475C.197, 475C.209, 475C.265, 475C.269, 475C.273, 475C.742 and 475C.746 by sections 27
to 34 of this 2024 Act.
CAPTIONS
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 12
SECTION 36. The unit captions used in this 2024 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2024 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 37. This 2024 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2024 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House March 6, 2024
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 7, 2024
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4121 (HB 4121-A) Page 13